Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5772.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Child advocate" means that term as defined in section 2 of the office of the child advocate act, 1994 PA 204, MCL 722.922. (b) "Council" means the legislative council created under the legislative council act, 1986 PA 268, MCL 4.1101 to 4.1901. (c) "Fetal alcohol spectrum disorders" means a range of effects that occur in an individual who was exposed to alcohol before birth. Fetal alcohol spectrum disorders include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (i) Fetal alcohol syndrome. (ii) Partial fetal alcohol syndrome. (iii) Alcohol-related neurodevelopmental syndrome. (iv) Static encephalopathy-alcohol exposed. (v) Neurobehavioral disorder associated with prenatal alcohol exposure. (vi) Alcohol-related birth defects. (d) "Task force" means the fetal alcohol spectrum disorders task force created in section 3. (e) "Tribal legislative liaison" means liaison as that term is defined in section 1 of 2024 PA 208, MCL 4.791. Sec. 3. The fetal alcohol spectrum disorders task force is created in the legislative council for purposes of preventing fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and providing for the identification, treatment, and support of individuals with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and the individuals' families. Sec. 5. (1) The governor, in consultation with the chairpersons of the house of representatives committee on health policy and senate committee on health policy, or their successor committees, shall appoint members to the task force. Members of the task force shall include all of the following individuals: (a) The following voting members: (i) A parent or guardian of a minor with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders. (ii) A licensed physician. (iii) A licensed mental health provider. (iv) A licensed behavioral health provider. (v) A substance use disorder treatment provider. (vi) A disability advocate or provider. (vii) A juvenile probation officer or specialist. (viii) A special education administrator. (ix) A director in a fetal alcohol spectrum disorders diagnostic clinic. (x) One member of the majority and minority parties from each chamber of the state legislature. (xi) An at-large member with experience in substance abuse prevention, health care, mental health, law enforcement, education, local government, social work, data science, or similar fields. (b) The following ex officio members serving without vote: (i) The director of the department of health and human services or a designee of the director with expertise in fetal alcohol spectrum disorders. (ii) The council administrator or a designee of the council administrator. (iii) The tribal legislative liaison or a designee of the tribal legislative liaison. (iv) The child advocate or a designee of the child advocate. (2) Initial members of the task force must be appointed within 60 days after the effective date of this act. Of the first voting members appointed, 5 shall be appointed to 3-year terms,Â  4 to 2-year terms, and 5 to 1-year terms. (3) After the first appointment, the term of a voting member of the task force is 3 years or until a successor is appointed, whichever is later. (4) The governor and the chairpersons of the house of representatives committee on health policy and senate committee on health policy, or their successor committees, may concur to remove a member of the task force for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. (5) The council administrator or a designee of the council administrator shall serve as secretary of the task force. The council administrator shall call the first meeting of the task force. The task force shall elect a chairperson and may elect other necessary or appropriate officers at the first meeting. The task force must meet in person at least quarterly but may meet more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of 7 or more members. (6) Seven voting members of the task force constitute a quorum for transacting business. The vote of a majority of voting members appointed and serving is required for task force action. (7) Members of the task force shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties as members of the task force. Sec. 7. The task force shall conduct its business at public meetings of the task force held in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. Sec. 9. A writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the task force in the performance of an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. Sec. 11. The duties of the task force include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (a) Developing a statewide strategic plan to substantially reduce prenatal alcohol exposure and provide for the identification, treatment, and support of individuals with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and their families. (b) Providing guidance on the implementation of the strategic plan developed under subdivision (a) by reviewing and commenting on grant proposals addressing prenatal alcohol and substance exposure and fetal alcohol spectrum disorders informed supports and interventions. (c) Identifying existing federal or state agency programs related to prenatal alcohol and substance exposure and fetal alcohol spectrum disorders, and making recommendations for the utilization and adaptation of the programs to include prenatal alcohol screening and fetal alcohol spectrum disorders informed supports and interventions. (d) Reviewing programs of state agencies that relate to prenatal alcohol or substance exposure and fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and coordinating the programs that are interdepartmental in nature in accordance with an interagency agreement, if feasible. (e) Making legislative recommendations on issues related to fetal alcohol spectrum disorders. (f) Developing and disseminating fetal alcohol spectrum disorders informed educational resources and recommending that fetal alcohol spectrum disorders be embedded in health education standards, specifically within the modules that deal with alcohol and substance abuse. (g) Reviewing local, state, and federal initiatives and activities related to education, prevention, treatment, and services for individuals and families affected by fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and co-occurring mental health conditions and establishing priorities to address fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and co-occurring health conditions, to recommend funding initiatives to the legislature. (h) Providing training materials on fetal alcohol spectrum disorders to school personnel. (i) Expanding access to fetal alcohol spectrum disorders diagnostic tools. Sec. 13. (1) The task force shall annually submit a written report to the governor, house of representatives, senate, and the chairpersons of the house of representatives committee on health policy and senate committee on health policy, or their successor committees, that includes all of the following: (a) A statewide evidence-based needs assessment that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (i) A summary of current local, state, and federal funding used to address fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and co-occurring health conditions. (ii) A description of the most common risk factors associated with fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and co-occurring health conditions. (iii) An analysis, based on quantitative and qualitative data, of the effects on this state of fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and co-occurring health conditions. (b) Goals and recommendations and their rationale, sustainability plans, and performance indicators relating to both of the following: (i) Prevention, treatment, recovery, and harm reduction efforts for fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and co-occurring health conditions. (ii) Reduction of disparities in access to prevention, intervention, and treatment programs, services, supports, and resources. (c) An evidence-based assessment of the prior use of state appropriated funds, including the extent to which the expenditures redressed fetal alcohol spectrum disorders in this state. (d) Recommended funding for tasks, activities, projects, and initiatives that would support the objectives of the commission. (e) If applicable, recommended additional legislation needed to accomplish the objectives of the task force. (2) The council shall post the written report submitted under subsection (1) on its website. Sec. 15. This act expires 5 years after the first meeting of the task force, and the authority of the task force ceases to exist on that date, unless reauthorized by the governor, or the chairpersons of the house of representatives committee on health policy and senate committee on health policy, or their successor committees.